District of Columbia, session 26, B26-0163.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE COUNCIL OF THE DISTRICT OF COLUMBIA, That this
act may be cited as the “Unlicensed Establishment Enforcement Clarification Temporary
Amendment Act of 2025”.
Sec. 2. The Legalization of Marijuana for Medical Treatment Initiative of 1999, effective
July 27, 2010 (D.C. Law 18-210; D.C. Official Code § 7-1671.01 et seq.), is amended as follows:
(a) Section 2 (D.C. Official Code § 7-1671.01) is amended as follows:
(1) A new paragraph (20B-i) is added to read as follows:
“(20B-i) “Schedule I substance” means a controlled substance listed in section
204 of the District of Columbia Uniform Controlled Substances Act of 1981, effective August 5,
1981 (D.C. Law 4-29; D.C. Official Code § 48-902.04), or rules implementing that section.”.
(2) Paragraph (22) is amended to read as follows:
“(22) “Unlicensed establishment” means:
“(A) A sole proprietorship, partnership, or other business entity that:
1

ENROLLED ORIGINAL
“(i) Sells, exchanges as part of a commercial transaction, or
delivers cannabis and cannabis products;
“(ii) Operates at or delivers from a specific location in the District;
and
“(iii) Is not licensed by ABCA as a cultivation center, retailer,
internet retailer, manufacturer, courier, or testing laboratory; or
“(B) For purposes of section 9(c-1), (g), (h), and (i), a sole proprietorship,
partnership, or other business entity that:
“(i) Sells, exchanges as part of a commercial transaction, or
delivers Schedule I substances or products that contain Schedule I substances; and
“(ii) Operates at or delivers from a specific location in the
District.”.
(b) Section 7b (D.C. Official Code § 7-1671.06b) is amended by adding a new subsection
(a-1) to read as follows:
“(a-1) Notwithstanding any other provision of this section, an unlicensed establishment
may be summarily closed and padlocked pursuant to section 9(g) after April 1, 2025.”.
(c) Section 9 (D.C. Official Code § 7-1671.08) is amended as follows:
(1) A new subsection (c-1) is added to read as follows:
“(c-1) It shall be a violation of this act for a licensed establishment or an unlicensed
establishment (regardless of whether the unlicensed establishment has an application pending
before the ABC Board) to sell, exchange as part of a commercial transaction, or deliver Schedule
I substances or products that contain Schedule I substances.”.
(2) Subsection (b) is amended by redesignating the second paragraph (1) as
paragraph (2).
(3) Subsection (g) is amended as follows:
(A) Paragraph (1) is amended as follows:
(i) Strike the phrase “this title” and insert the phrase “this act” in
its place.
(ii) Strike the phrase “cannabis products” and insert the phrase
“cannabis products, Schedule I substances, or products that contain Schedule I substances” in its
place.
(B) A new paragraph (6) is added to read as follows:
“(6) The ABC Board may continue the summary closure, padlocking of the
premises, and seizure of cannabis, cannabis products, Schedule I substances, and products
containing Schedule I substances until the imminent danger that triggered the summary closure is
abated. Even if the imminent danger that triggered the summary closure is abated, the ABC
Board may continue the summary closure, order of padlocking, and seizure of cannabis, cannabis
2

ENROLLED ORIGINAL
products, Schedule I substances, and products containing Schedule I substances, if the ABC
Board determines, in its reasonable judgment, the imminent danger is likely to recur.”.
(4) A new subsection (g-1) is added to read as follows:
“(g-1)(1) The ABC Board may summarily close and order the padlocking, by ABCA or
MPD without a prior hearing, of a licensed establishment, and ABCA or MPD may seize all
cannabis, cannabis products, Schedule I substances, and products containing Schedule I
substances found at the premises, if, after an inspection, ABCA determines that the licensed
establishment presents an imminent danger to the health and safety of the public for the reasons
set forth in subsection (g)(2)(C) through (G) of this section.
“(2) ABCA shall provide the licensed establishment’s owner and the property
owner with written notice of the summary closure and the right to request a hearing.
“(3) The owner of the licensed establishment shall have 5 business days after
service of the notice of summary closure to request a hearing with the ABC Board, which shall
hold a hearing within 5 business days of a timely request.
“(4) The ABC Board shall issue a written decision within 5 business days after the
hearing, or if no hearing is requested, within 10 business days after the service of the notice.”.
“(5) The ABC Board may continue the summary closure, padlocking of the
premises, and seizure of cannabis, cannabis products, Schedule I substances, and products
containing Schedule I substances until the imminent danger that triggered the summary closure is
abated. Even if the imminent danger that triggered the summary closure is abated, the ABC
Board may continue the summary closure, order of padlocking, and seizure of cannabis, cannabis
products, Schedule I substances, and products containing Schedule I substances, if the ABC
Board determines, in its reasonable judgment, the imminent danger is likely to recur.”.
(5) Subsection (h) is amended as follows:
(A) Paragraph (1) is amended to read as follows:
“(1) ABCA or the Metropolitan Police Department may post signage at the site of
the unlicensed establishment or licensed establishment indicating that activity that violates this
act has been found to have occurred at the establishment.”.
(B) Paragraph (2) is amended by striking the phrase “unlicensed
establishment” and inserting the phrase “unlicensed establishment or licensed establishment” in
its place.
(6) Subsection (i)(1) is amended to read as follows:
“(i)(1) An ABCA investigator may test cannabis and cannabis products found at a
licensed establishment or unlicensed establishment to quantify their THC content and may test
other substances and products found at a licensed establishment or unlicensed establishment for
the presence and quantity of a Schedule I substance.”.
Sec. 3. Fiscal impact statement.
3

ENROLLED ORIGINAL
The Council adopts the fiscal impact statement of the Budget Director as the fiscal impact
statement required by section 4a of the General Legislative Procedures Act of 1975, approved
October 16, 2006 (120 Stat. 2038; D.C. Official Code § 1-301.47a).
Sec. 4. Effective date.
(a) This act shall take effect following approval by the Mayor (or in the event of veto by
the Mayor, action by the Council to override the veto), a 30-day period of congressional review
as provided in section 602(c)(1) of the District of Columbia Home Rule Act, approved December
24, 1973 (87 Stat. 813; D.C. Official Code § 1-206.02(c)(1)), and publication in the District of
Columbia Register.
(b) This act shall expire after 225 days of its having taken effect.
___________________________________
Chairman
Council of the District of Columbia
_________________________________
Mayor
District of Columbia
4